src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON STUORAK !!= @CODE@  Only for stuorak. It hase two attributes. Has even-syllable comparison: stuoráp and stuorámus.Sg Acc: stuoragav, attr: stuor and stuorra. This might be a -k derivation of adjective stuorre attr stuor(ra). The comparison is thus based on the original adjective and thus it naturally is an even syll comparison.
                 +A:%>     ATTR           ;
          +A+Use/NG:ra%>   ATTR           ;
! +A:ra VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:ak     VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:ak%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
                 +A:ag%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:á%>    BU/MUS         ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:ak%>   R              ;
                 +A:ag%>   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: stuorak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ stuorak:               stuorak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ stuoragav:             stuorak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ stuorra:                stuorak+A+Attr
!!€ stuor:                stuorak+A+Attr
!!€ stuoráp:           stuorak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON RIHTSOK !!= @CODE@ Lexicon for miscellanious uneven adjectives. No vowel changes. The lexicon gives no attribute, either because the adjective dosnºt have attr or because there is stemvowel change in attr that the lexicon canºt handle, or because there are strange atrributes that donºt fit to any other lexicon (these attributes are hardcoded). Sg Acc: rihtsogav (attr for words in this lexicon are hardcoded). Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>Q1 VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:%>Q1 N-ODDCASE      ;
                 +A:%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1 R              ;
                 +A:%>   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: måjdås # Odd-syllable test
!!€ måjdås:               måjdås+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ måjddåsav:             måjdås+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ måjddåsabbo:           måjdås+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON SJÆVNNJAT !!= @CODE@ Lexicon for miscellanious uneven adjectives on -k, -t, -l, -s. The last vowel changes, e>á, e>å, o>u, e>i. The lexicon gives no attribute, either because the adjective dosnºt have attr, because there is stemvowel change in attr that the lexicon canºt handle or because there are strange atrributes that donºt fit to any other lexicon (these attributes are hardcoded). Sg Acc: sjævnnjadav. 
                 +A:%>Q1   VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:%>Q1   N-ODDCASE      ;
                 +A:%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1   R              ;
                 +A:%>X5   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: rávdes # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rávdes:                rávdes+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ rávddásav:             rávdes+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rávddásabbo:           rávdes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON SUOHKAT !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -at and -åt, with attribute III -is. No vowel change. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: suohkadav, attr: suohkkis,
                 +A:is%>     ATTR           ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:a%>Q1t   VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:a%>Q1t   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:a%>Q1d   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:a%>Q1d   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1dit ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:a%>Q1t   R              ;
                  +A:a%>Q1d   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: rávvat # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rávvat:               rávvat+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ rávvadav:             rávvat+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rávvis:               rávvat+A+Attr
!!€ rávvadabbo:           rávvat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON LÅSSÅT !!= @CODE@ As f3. in Spiik. So far the only word i this lexicon i "låssåt", because both låssis and låsså are attr and comparative is both låsep(hybrid?) and låssådabbo.
                              +A+Use/NG:is%>          ATTR           ;
                                     +A:å%>           ATTR           ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! +A:å VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                                     +A:åt            VUOHTA         ;
                                     +A:åt%>          N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                                     +A:åd%>          OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                              +A+Use/NG:åd%>          ABBO/AMOS      ;
                                     +A:e%>Q1         BU/MUS         ;
! +A+Comp:e%>Q1 BUStem ; ! Because we want låsebut
! +A+Superl:e%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
          +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:e»Q1busj%>    ENDLEX         ;
              +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg:e»Q1busj%>    ATTR           ;
                 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1buttja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
                 +Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1budtja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e»Q1buttja%>t ENDLEX         ;
                     +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åd%>it        ENDLEX         ;
                            +A+Cmp/SgNom:åt%>          R              ;
                                     +A:åd%>          ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: låssåt # Odd-syllable test
!!€ låssåt:               låssåt+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ låssådav:             låssåt+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ låssis:               låssåt+A+Attr
!!€ låsså:               låssåt+A+Attr
!!€ låssådabbo:           låssåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ låsep:           låssåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON TSIBTSA !!= @CODE@ Adjectives that end on -a. Attribute is same as pred. Sg Acc: tsibttsagav, Attr: tsibtsa. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>X3   ATTR           ;
! +A:%>X3 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
          +A+Sg+Nom:%>X3   ENDLEX         ;
                 +A:%>X5   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>X5   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X5it ENDLEX         ;
                 +A:%>X5   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: bihtja # Odd-syllable test
!!€ bihtja:                 bihtja+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ bihttjagav:             bihtja+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ bihtja:                 bihtja+A+Attr
!!€ bihttjagabbo:           bihtja+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON TJALMMIS !!= @CODE@ Adjectives ending on -is. With two attributes; same as pred and -isis. As h. in Spiik. Sg Acc: tjalmmisav, Attr: tjalmmis (Spiik og Kintel).and tjalmmisis (Korhonen).
                 +A:%>X2 ATTR           ;
                 +A:is%> ATTR           ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! +A:%>X2 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:%>X2 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>X5 ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it ENDLEX         ; !Can these really form adverbs?
                 +A:%>X5 ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: mujttis # Odd-syllable test
!!€ mujttis:                 mujttis+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ mujttisav:             mujttis+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ mujttis:                 mujttis+A+Attr
!!€ mujttisis:                 mujttis+A+Attr
!!€ mujttisabbo:           mujttis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON IENNILS !!= @CODE@ no comparatives, no attr
 +A:   VUOHTA         ;
 +A:%> N-ODDCASE      ;
 +A:%> OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
 +A:   NAMÁK          ;
 +A:%> R              ;

!!€gt-norm: ieŋŋils # Odd-syllable test
!!€ ieŋŋils:                 ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ ieŋŋilsav:             ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Acc


!!
!! Inherent comparatives and superlatives
!!

LEXICON NUORTTALABBO   !!= @CODE@ Inherent comparatives, gives both comp and superl. Most of the words are the compared forms of -el(a) words, like nuorttal, lullel.
 +A:%> ABBO/AMOS ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: guddnelabbo # Even-syllable test
!!€ guddnelabbo:           guddnelabbo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ guddnelamos:           guddnelabbo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
!!€ guddnelap:             guddnelabbo+A+Comp+Attr
!!€ guddnelup:             guddnelabbo+A+Comp+Attr
