src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
alek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:aleg9 RIHTSOK ; !
aluk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:alug9 SJÆVNNJAT ; !
badjelabbo:badjel NUORTTALABBO ;
bahák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahág9 SJÆVNNJAT ; !
bedjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bedºjad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
bielljis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bielºljis TJALMMIS ; !
bihtja:bihttjag8 TSIBTSA ;
bijllamåjdås+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bijlla#måjddås RIHTSOK ; !
buolljat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buolºlj SUOHKAT ; !
dulppat:dulpºp SUOHKAT ;
duolbbat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duolbºb SUOHKAT ; !
duollat:duolºl SUOHKAT ;
dárbbahabbo:dárbbah NUORTTALABBO ;
dållåruoppsat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dållå#ruopºps SUOHKAT ; !
gasuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gasug9 SJÆVNNJAT ; !
gednat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gedºnad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
giednat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giedºnad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; !
gilggat:gilgºg SUOHKAT ;
guddnelabbo:guddnel NUORTTALABBO ;
guovddelabbo:guovddel NUORTTALABBO ;
guovggat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovgºg SUOHKAT ; !
guovggisruoppsat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovggis#ruopºps SUOHKAT ; !
guovggisrussjkat:guovggis#rusºsjk SUOHKAT ;
gutjel:guhtjel SJÆVNNJAT ;
gábmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gábbm SUOHKAT ; !
gåbduk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåbdug9 SJÆVNNJAT ; !
gåmosjævnnjat:gåmo#sjævnºnjad9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
gårrat:gårºrad9 RIHTSOK ; ! SUOHKAT
gærgos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gærggos SJÆVNNJAT ; !
gærgos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gærgºgos SJÆVNNJAT ; !
gærmmat:gærmºmad9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
ieŋŋils:ieŋŋils IENNILS ;
jalggat:jalgºg SUOHKAT ;
jaskadabbo:jaskad NUORTTALABBO ;
jasskat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jasºsk SUOHKAT ; !
jerrat:jerºrad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
jålbbåt+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jålbºbåd9 RIHTSOK ; ! SUOHKAT
jårbbåt+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jårbºbåd9 RIHTSOK ; ! SUOHKAT
kristállatjuovggat:kristálla#tjuovgºg SUOHKAT ;
lullelabbo:lullel NUORTTALABBO ;
lávtas:láktas SJÆVNNJAT ;
låssåt+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:låss LÅSSÅT ; !
maduk:madug9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
madák:madág9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
mujttis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mujtºtis TJALMMIS ; !
muohtavielggat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:muohta#vielgºg SUOHKAT ; !
másjket+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:másjked9 RIHTSOK ; !
måjdås+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:måjddås RIHTSOK ; !
månnevielggat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:månne#vielgºg SUOHKAT ; !
njuolggat:njuolgºg SUOHKAT ;
njuvggat:njuvgºg SUOHKAT ;
njárbbat:njárbºb SUOHKAT ;
nuorttalabbo:nuorttal NUORTTALABBO ;
oarjjelabbo:oarjjel NUORTTALABBO ;
purpur:purpur RIHTSOK ;
rejdas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ræjddas SJÆVNNJAT ; !
rihtsok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rihtºsog9 RIHTSOK ; !
roahkkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roahkºk SUOHKAT ; !
ruodnat:ruoddn SUOHKAT ;
ruoppsat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruopºps SUOHKAT ; !
russjkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rusºsjk SUOHKAT ; !
rávdes:rávddes SJÆVNNJAT ;
rávvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rávºv SUOHKAT ; !
sajij:sadjih9 RIHTSOK ;
sajij:sajih9 RIHTSOK ;
sjallat:sjalºl SUOHKAT ;
sjerrat:sjerºrad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
sjkebtjas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjkæbttjas SJÆVNNJAT ; !
sjkernja:sjkærnnjag8 TSIBTSA ;
sjuodnjat:sjuoddnj SUOHKAT ;
sjævnnjat:sjævnºnjad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
skárlakruoppsat:skárlak#ruopºps SUOHKAT ;
sliggot:sligºgod9 RIHTSOK ;
slåtjos:slåhtjos SJÆVNNJAT ;
smávuk:smávug9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
snjiltjas+v1+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snjiltjas SJÆVNNJAT ; !
snjiltjas+v2+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjnjiltjas SJÆVNNJAT ; !
stajggat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stajgºgad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
stuorak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuor STUORAK ; !
stájggat:stájgºgad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
suodjat:suoddj SUOHKAT ;
suohkat:suohkk SUOHKAT ;
suvres+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suvrres SJÆVNNJAT ; !
sáhppat:sáhpºp SUOHKAT ;
sárggat:sárgºg SUOHKAT ;
tjaktjarávvat:tjaktja#rávºv SUOHKAT ;
tjalmmis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjalmºmis TJALMMIS ; !
tjuodnat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuoddn SUOHKAT ; !
tjuorbbat:tjuorbºb SUOHKAT ;
tjuovggat:tjuovgºg SUOHKAT ;
tjuovggisalek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuovggis#aleg9 RIHTSOK ; !
tjuovggisrávvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuovggis#rávºv SUOHKAT ; !
tjáhppat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhpºp SUOHKAT ; !
tjáhppisalek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhppis#aleg9 RIHTSOK ; !
tjáhppisrávvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhppis#rávºv SUOHKAT ; !
tjárrat:tjárºrad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
tjårggåt+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjårgºgåd9 RIHTSOK ; ! SUOHKAT
tsibtsa:tsibttsag8 TSIBTSA ;
varraruoppsat:varra#ruopºps SUOHKAT ; !
vedjat:vedºjad9 SJÆVNNJAT ; ! SUOHKAT
visskat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:visºsk SUOHKAT ; !
vädjat:vä9dºjad9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
vædjat:væ9dºjad9 SJÆVNNJAT ;
ållusabbo:ållus NUORTTALABBO ; 
